Hawaii statutes.
[§437B-17] Sign required concerning board;
notice to customer. The board shall design and approve of a sign which
shall be placed in all motor vehicle repair dealer locations in a place and
manner conspicuous to the public. Such sign shall give notice that inquiries
concerning service may be made to the board and shall contain the telephone
number of the board. The sign shall also give notice that the customer is
entitled to a return of replaced parts upon the customer's request therefor at
the time the work order is taken. [L 1975, c 143, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next